Arkansas, session 2025, HB1141.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-1-103(a), concerning misdemeanors under
the laws governing elections in the State of Arkansas, is amended to add an
additional subdivision to read as follows:
(25)(A)(i) As used in this subdivision (a)(25), "deep fake" means a
medium of communication that is deliberately manipulated using artificial
intelligence technology to appear to depict a real person performing an
action that did not occur for the purpose of attempting to deceive the viewer
into believing the action did occur and for which no reasonable observer
could believe there was an intent other than to injure the candidate.
(ii) As used in this subdivision (a)(25), "deep
fake" does not include:
(a) A cartoon, caricature, or any other
communication that a reasonable viewer would understand to be a satirical
representation of the individual;
(b) A communication altered only to change the
saturation, brightness, contrast, color, or any other superficial quality of
*LJH014*
02-12-2025 10:02:50 LJH014

As Engrossed: H2/12/25 HB1141
the image; or
(c) Any communication that is otherwise lawful
under the Arkansas Constitution, Article 2, § 6 or under the First Amendment
to the United States Constitution.

(B) It shall be unlawful for a person to purposely injure
a candidate for office in Arkansas by:
(i) Creating or causing to be created a deep fake;
and
(ii) Publishing, distributing, or causing to be
published or distributed the deep fake during the period beginning ninety
(90) days before the date of the general election and ending on the date of
the general election with the knowledge that the published or distributed
communication was a deep fake.
(C) It is an affirmative defense to prosecution for an
offense under this subdivision (a)(25) that the deep fake of the candidate
included a clear label on the image stating that the communication was a deep
fake.
/s/R. Scott Richardson

















02-12-2025 10:02:50 LJH014